Louisiana, session 2026, HB1010.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:1836 is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 47:2058.1 is
hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1836. Studies and reports
A. In addition to the duties prescribed elsewhere in this Title, the tax
commission shall examine carefully into all cases where evasion or violation of the
laws for assessment and taxation of property is alleged, complained of or discovered,
and ascertain wherein existing laws are defective or are improperly or negligently
administered.
B. The tax commission shall also investigate the tax systems of other states
and countries and formulate and recommend such legislation as may be deemed
expedient to prevent evasion of assessment and secure just and equal taxation.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1010 ENROLLED
C.(1) The tax commission shall transmit to the governor and to each member
of the legislature, not less than thirty days before the meeting of the legislature, a
communication report setting forth, in an abbreviated, clear and concise form such
facts drawn from the tax commission's general report as may be instructive to the
members in regard to existing conditions or needed legislation. The report to the
governor and members of the legislature shall include, at minimum, all of the
following:
(a) The total assessed value of taxable property by parish.
(b) The total amount of ad valorem taxes assessed by parish.
(c) The total amount of ad valorem taxes collected by parish.
(d) A breakdown of the taxes assessed by property classification, including
but not limited to residential, commercial, industrial, and public service property.
(e) Ad valorem tax collection amounts by parish in comparison to the total
assessed value of property in the parish, expressed as a percentage.
(2) The tax commission may include in the report required by this
Subsection any additional data or analysis as it deems necessary to provide a
comprehensive understanding of ad valorem tax assessments and collections.
* * *
§2058.1. Report of assessed values and collections data
A.(1) On or before November fifteenth of each year, the assessor of each
parish shall provide to the Louisiana Tax Commission a report of the total amount
of ad valorem property taxes assessed within the parish for the preceding tax year.
The assessor shall itemize the report by property classification and by property listed
in accordance with R.S. 47:1957.
(2) On or before November fifteenth of each year, the tax collector of each
parish shall provide to the Louisiana Tax Commission a report of the total amount
of all ad valorem taxes collected for the preceding tax year on all taxable property
within the parish.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1010 ENROLLED
B. The Louisiana Tax Commission shall include the information received
pursuant to this Section in each report issued in accordance with the requirements of
R.S. 47:1836.
C. No person or entity shall use information broadcast or collected by
automatic dependent surveillance-broadcast systems as a means for calculating,
generating, and collecting ad valorem taxes.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.